Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that students enrolled in online school programs are required to travel to designated testing sites for state assessments. This travel can impose significant burdens on students and families, including requiring parents or guardians to take time off from work, travel long distances, and incur costs for accommodations and meals.As a result of these burdens, some parents have chosen to excuse their students from taking state assessments. These choices, however, impact the ability of educators and the state to measure the academic progress of these students.The legislature finds that to ensure equitable access to state assessments and to uphold their integrity, the state must permit remote testing options for students enrolled in online school programs that align with the students' online instruction environments.The legislature, therefore, intends to expressly permit school districts to offer remote testing options for students enrolled in online education programs to reduce barriers to assessment participation, and maintain fairness, equity, and security in the assessment process.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.250 RCW to read as follows:(1) Beginning in the 2027-28 school year, school districts with online school programs may provide all students within those programs with the ability to complete statewide assessments remotely.(2)(a) By April 1, 2027, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop or review and update as necessary assessment administration and security policies to support remote testing options for students enrolled in online school programs including the remote administration of statewide academic assessments. The policies required by this subsection (2), at a minimum, must address:(i) Required qualifications for testing personnel;(ii) The maximum ratio of students to proctors;(iii) Requirements for remote testing environments, including restrictions on access to devices and persons, and procedures for monitoring students completing tests;(iv) Device and network requirements; and(v) Parental consent and agreement forms.(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall periodically review and revise as necessary the policies required by this subsection (2).(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt and revise as necessary rules to implement this section. When adopting rules in accordance with this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction is encouraged to consider utilizing pilot rule making as provided in RCW 34.05.310.(4) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Device" means any electronic equipment, including computers, tablets, and smartphones, used for test administration; and(b) "Statewide assessments" and "statewide academic assessments" means the general and alternate academic achievement assessments administered statewide for English language arts, mathematics, and science.--- END ---